Maryland, session 2025, SB0673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0673*

SENATE BILL 673
INDICATED.
(2) “ELIGIBLE TEACHER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS EMPLOYED
AS A TEACHER IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE STATE.
(3) “NONPUBLIC SCHOOL” MEANS AN ELEMENTARY OR SECONDARY
SCHOOL IN THE STATE THAT IS NOT PART OF THE PUBLIC ELEMENTARY AND
SECONDARY EDUCATION SYSTEM OF THE STATE.
(4) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND STEM PROGRAM.
(5) “STEM” MEANS A SCIENCE FIELD, MATHEMATICS, TECHNOLOGY
EDUCATION, OR COMPUTER SCIENCE EDUCATION.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND STEM PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(I) PROVIDE ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION TO EDUCATORS
WHO TEACH STEM CLASSES AT A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL;
(II) INCENTIVIZE CURRENT TEACHERS TO OBTAIN THE
NECESSARY QUALIFICATIONS TO TEACH STEM SUBJECTS;
(III) INCENTIVIZE INDIVIDUALS TO ENTER THE TEACHING
PROFESSION TO FILL THE DEMAND FOR QUALIFIED EDUCATORS IN STEM
SUBJECTS;
(IV) ASSIST IN ADDRESSING THE DIFFICULTIES PUBLIC AND
NONPUBLIC SCHOOLS HAVE IN ATTRACTING QUALIFIED EDUCATORS IN STEM
FIELDS; AND
(V) IMPROVE STATEWIDE ACCESS TO EDUCATION IN THE STEM
FIELDS TO ADDRESS THE WORKFORCE DEMANDS IN THE STATE.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) BEGINNING IN THE 2025–2026 SCHOOL YEAR, AN ELIGIBLE
TEACHER MAY RECEIVE ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION TO TEACH STEM CLASSES AT
A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) A NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT IS INTERESTED IN PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM SHALL:

SENATE BILL 673 3
(I) PARTNER WITH AT LEAST ONE ELIGIBLE TEACHER WHO
AGREES TO TEACH STEM CLASSES AT THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AT TIMES
MUTUALLY AGREED ON BY THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOL; AND
(II) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) IF AN ELIGIBLE TEACHER IS EMPLOYED AS A TEACHER IN THE
LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM, THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY OBJECT TO THE ELIGIBLE
TEACHER PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM IF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM CITES,
WITH SUFFICIENT SUPPORTING EVIDENCE, AS DEFINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, A
VALID REASON FOR THE OBJECTION, INCLUDING THAT:
(I) THE PROPOSED HOURS AT THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL
CONFLICT WITH THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER’S WORK RESPONSIBILITY IN THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM AND NO RESOLUTION COULD BE FOUND AFTER CONSULTING WITH
THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER AND THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL; OR
(II) APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED PARTNERSHIP BETWEEN THE
NONPUBLIC SCHOOL AND THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER WOULD SUBSTANTIALLY IMPACT
THE QUALITY OF STUDENT INSTRUCTION IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH APPLICATION
PROCEDURES AND DEADLINES FOR THE PROGRAM THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAMES OF THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, ELIGIBLE
TEACHER, AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IN WHICH THE
ELIGIBLE TEACHER IS EMPLOYED;
(II) A SIGNED AGREEMENT FROM THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL
THAT THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER WILL TEACH AT THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL DURING
HOURS WHEN THE TEACHER HAS NO CONFLICTING DUTIES AT THE PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(III) THE PROPOSED SCHEDULE AND GRADES TO BE TAUGHT BY
THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER AT THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL;
(IV) THE NUMBER OF STUDENTS, BASED ON ENROLLMENT
PROJECTIONS, THAT WILL RECEIVE INSTRUCTION FROM THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER
UNDER THE PROPOSED SCHEDULE AT THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL;

SENATE BILL 673
(V) CERTIFICATION FROM THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT THE
ELIGIBLE TEACHER SHALL PROVIDE ONLY SECULAR INSTRUCTION AT THE
NONPUBLIC SCHOOL; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) (I) IF AN ELIGIBLE TEACHER IS EMPLOYED BY A LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SEND THE COMPLETED APPLICATION
TO THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(II) IF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM OBJECTS TO THE ELIGIBLE
TEACHER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM, WITHIN 10 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE COMPLETED APPLICATION, THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL
NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT OF ITS OBJECTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION
(C)(3) OF THIS SECTION.
(III) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT THE OBJECTION
OF THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM IS VALID IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C)(3)
OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REJECT THE APPLICATION AND
INFORM THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER AND THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL THAT THE
APPLICATION WAS REJECTED.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH SELECTION CRITERIA TO
AWARD GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS, THE DEPARTMENT
SHALL AWARD GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM BASED ON REVIEW OF THE
APPLICATIONS.
(3) (I) FUNDS AWARDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.
(II) THE PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL USE THE
FUNDS TO PROVIDE COMPENSATION TO AN ELIGIBLE TEACHER PARTICIPATING IN
THE PROGRAM.
(III) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH PROCESSES AND
PROCEDURES FOR REIMBURSEMENT, INCLUDING AN APPLICATION FORM, AND THE
FREQUENCY AND TIMELINE FOR REIMBURSEMENT.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE

SENATE BILL 673 5
DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT AWARDED TO A
PARTICIPATING ELIGIBLE TEACHER, WHICH SHALL BE AT LEAST EQUAL TO THE
NUMBER OF HOURS THE TEACHER TEACHES STEM CLASSES AT A NONPUBLIC
SCHOOL MULTIPLIED BY THE AVERAGE HOURLY SALARY OF A PUBLIC SCHOOL
TEACHER IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MULTIPLIED BY 1.25.
(II) THE NUMBER OF HOURS USED TO CALCULATE THE AMOUNT
OF EACH GRANT IN SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY NOT EXCEED THE
NUMBER OF HOURS IN THE APPROVED APPLICATION OF THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.
(5) PAYMENTS RECEIVED BY AN ELIGIBLE TEACHER UNDER THE
PROGRAM MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED COMPENSATION UNDER A COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING AGREEMENT.
(6) FUNDS APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM SHALL BE USED
EXCLUSIVELY TO PAY ELIGIBLE TEACHERS TO TEACH STEM CLASSES AT A
PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL, AND THE ELIGIBLE TEACHER SHALL TEACH
ONLY THE CLASSES STIPULATED UNDER THE PROGRAM AT THE NONPUBLIC
SCHOOL.
(F) (1) IF A PARTICIPATING NONPUBLIC SCHOOL DETERMINES THAT A
PARTICIPATING ELIGIBLE TEACHER IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROGRAM OR
IS VIOLATING THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL’S CODE OF CONDUCT OR THE FACULTY
HANDBOOK, THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL MAY:
(I) REQUEST THAT THE TEACHER BE REMOVED FROM
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM AT THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL; AND
(II) SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT INFORMATION THAT
DEMONSTRATES NONCOMPLIANCE WITH THE PROGRAM, THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL’S
CODE OF CONDUCT, OR THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL’S FACULTY HANDBOOK.
(2) AFTER REVIEWING THE INFORMATION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY
TERMINATE THE TEACHER’S PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM AT THE NONPUBLIC
SCHOOL.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) DEVELOP A TEACHER INTEREST SURVEY; AND
(II) SHARE THE LIST OF ELIGIBLE TEACHERS ON REQUEST BY A
NONPUBLIC SCHOOL.

SENATE BILL 673
(2) EACH YEAR, EACH LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL:
(I) INFORM ALL TEACHERS EMPLOYED AT THE LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM ABOUT THE PROGRAM; AND
(II) SHARE THE TEACHER INTEREST SURVEY DEVELOPED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION WITH ALL TEACHERS EMPLOYED AT
THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM.
(H) (1) AT THE CONCLUSION OF EACH SCHOOL YEAR, A NONPUBLIC
SCHOOL PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
DEPARTMENT ON THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL’S IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE DAYS AND CLASSROOM HOURS THAT AN ELIGIBLE
TEACHER TAUGHT IN THE NONPUBLIC SCHOOL;
(II) INFORMATION REGARDING WHETHER ANY SCHEDULING
OBSTACLES WERE ENCOUNTERED AND, IF SO, HOW THEY WERE ADDRESSED;
(III) RECOMMENDATIONS TO IMPROVE THE PROGRAM; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER INFORMATION RELEVANT TO THE PROGRAM.
(I) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $250,000 TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR
GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.